Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-104
Thanksgiving Day; proclamation by Governor.

The Governor shall by proclamation set apart the fourth Thursday in each November as a day of solemn and public thanksgiving to Almighty God for His blessings to us as a state and nation, and no business shall be transacted on that day at any department of state.

Laws 1867, § 6, p. 101;

R.S.1913, § 5534;

C.S.1922, § 4830;

C.S.1929, § 84-105;

Laws 1941, c. 187, § 2, p. 756;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 84-105;

R.S.1943, § 84-104;

Laws 1945, c. 252, § 2, p. 789.

Other sections bearing on holidays, see sections 25-2221, 62-301, 81-113, and 84-1001.